Florida, session 2026, SB1626.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 83.684, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 83.684âRent reporting.â 31 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 32 (a)ââCredit reporting agencyâ means an agency that, for 33 monetary fees or dues or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, 34 regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of 35 assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other 36 information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer 37 reports to third parties and that uses any means or facility of 38 interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing 39 consumer reports. The term includes agencies such as Equifax, 40 Experian, and TransUnion. 41 (b)ââRent reporting serviceâ means a third-party service 42 that collects, verifies, and reports rent payment information to 43 a credit reporting agency. 44 (2)âA landlord may report a tenantâs rent payment history 45 to one or more credit reporting agencies. Rent reporting must be 46 conducted through a rent reporting service, or the landlord may 47 report directly to one or more credit reporting agencies if the 48 landlord complies with all applicable state and federal 49 regulations. 50 (3)(a)âA landlord must obtain written consent to report 51 rent payments from a tenant when a rental agreement is executed 52 or renewed. 53 (b)âThe written consent must clearly outline the potential 54 benefits and risks associated with rent reporting, including the 55 possibility of negative reporting if rent payments are not made 56 on time. 57 (c)âA landlord shall inform a tenant that his or her 58 consent for rent reporting is voluntary and that the tenant may 59 opt out of rent reporting at any time without penalty by mailing 60 or delivering to the landlord a true copy of a written notice to 61 opt out. 62 (d)âA landlord must, in accordance with s. 83.56(4), 63 provide a tenant with at least 30 daysâ written notice if the 64 landlord decides to start or stop reporting rent payments. 65 (4)(a)âIf a landlord elects to engage in rent reporting, 66 the landlord may require the tenant to pay to the landlord a fee 67 for such service. The fee may not exceed the lesser of the 68 actual cost to the landlord to provide rent reporting services 69 or $10 per month. If the landlord does not incur actual expenses 70 relating to rent reporting, the landlord may not charge the 71 tenant a fee under this subsection. 72 (b)âA landlord may not do any of the following: 73 1.âReport the payment or nonpayment of the fee to a credit 74 reporting agency. 75 2.âTerminate a tenantâs rental agreement because the tenant 76 did not pay the fee. 77 3.âDeduct the amount of the fee from the tenantâs deposit 78 money or rent. 79 (c)âIf the fee is unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord 80 may stop reporting the tenantâs rental payments to the credit 81 reporting agency or rent reporting service. 82 (5)âIf a tenant opts out of rent reporting or the tenant 83 fails to pay a fee for rent reporting services under subsection 84 (4), the tenant may not elect to again participate in rent 85 reporting for at least 6 months after the date on which the 86 landlord received the written request to opt out or the date on 87 which the fee under subsection (4) first becomes due. 88 (6)âA landlord may not terminate a tenantâs rental 89 agreement, increase a tenantâs rent, or engage in any other form 90 of retaliation solely because a tenant refuses, declines, or 91 opts out of participating in rent reporting. 92 (7)âThis section does not apply to a landlord of a 93 residential building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units 94 unless both of the following apply: 95 (a)âThe landlord owns more than one residential building, 96 regardless of the number of dwelling units in each building. 97 (b)âThe landlord is: 98 1.âA real estate investment trust; 99 2.âA corporation; or 100 3.âA limited liability company in which at least one member 101 is a corporation. 102 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.